District of Columbia statutes.
49-107

Camp duty.

The National Guard shall perform not less than 6 consecutive days of camp duty in each year, at such time as may be ordered by the Commanding General, and the Quartermaster General of the militia, subject to the approval of the Commanding General, shall provide, by rental or otherwise, a suitable camp-ground for the annual encampment of the militia, make the necessary provisions thereon for the encampment, and provide necessary transportation to and from the same for baggage and supplies.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 778, ch. 328, § 43
renumbered Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 46
1981 Ed., § 39-607.
1973 Ed., § 39-607.